test/src/morphology/Num-viidwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Numeral - vīdõz: # quantifiers 163 'eng fifth /est viies /fin' - full paradigm
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: vīdõz
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Gen: vīdõnd
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Par: vīdõndt
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Dat: vīdõndõn
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ins: vīdõndõks
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill: vīdõndõ
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ela: vīdõndõst
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Nom: vīdõndõd
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen: sadāndõd
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Par: vīdõndidi
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Dat: vīdõndõdõn
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ins: vīdõndõdõks
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill: vīdõndiž
     vīdõz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela: vīdõndist
